Arkansas, session 2025, HB1734.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-18-601(c)(3), concerning the signature
for a medical certification of death and the pronouncement of death, is
amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) A registered nurse employed by the attending hospice may
complete and sign the medical certification of death and pronounce death for
a patient who is terminally ill, whose death is anticipated, who is receiving
services from a hospice program certified under § 20-7-117, and who dies in a
hospice inpatient program or as a hospice patient in a nursing home or
hospital.
(B) An advanced practice registered nurse may complete and
sign the medical certificate of death and pronounce death of a patient in a
hospital setting if the advanced practice registered nurse is given authority
by the medical staff of the hospital and a physician other than an emergency
*JMB416*
04-08-2025 10:52:30 JMB416

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 S4/8/25 HB1734
department physician is not immediately available.

/s/Childress

































04-08-2025 10:52:30 JMB416